Hawaii, session 2026, SB2059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 139, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§139-    Immigration enforcement; delegation; prohibited.  No law enforcement agency shall enter into an agreement for the delegation of immigration enforcement authority to any state or county agency pursuant to title 8 United States Code Section 1357." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________